Louisiana, session 2026, SB246.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1260.44(E)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
22:1260.49 and 2401(4) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1260.44. Timeframes for determinations; concurrent review; retrospective review;
adverse determination
* * *
E.(1) * * *
(2) A health insurance issuer shall include in its written or electronic
notification of an adverse determination all of the reasons for the determination,
including the clinical rationale, and the instructions for initiating an appeal or
reconsideration of the determination, and whether artificial intelligence or an
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-545 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 246
automated decision system, as defined in R.S. 22:1260.49, was used in the
determination process.
* * *
§1260.49. Right to human review of health insurance claims
A.(1) "Artificial intelligence" as used in this Section means an
engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy, can
receive input, and can, for explicit or implicit objectives, generate or infer how
to generate outputs, including but not limited to predictions, simulations, and
recommendations that can influence physical or virtual environments.
(2) "Automated decision system" as used in this Section means any
computational process derived from machine learning, statistical modeling, data
analytics, or artificial intelligence that issues simplified output, including but
not limited to a score, classification, or recommendation, that is used to assist
or replace human discretionary decision making and materially impacts a
natural person.
B. The provisions of this Section are applicable to insurers, pharmacy
benefit managers, or an independent review agent or organization that does
either of the following:
(1) Uses artificial intelligence or an automated decision system for
utilization review.
(2) Contracts with a carrier that uses artificial intelligence or an
automated decision system for the purpose of utilization review.
C.(1) No entity subject to this Section shall utilize an artificial
intelligence or an automated decision system that does any of the following:
(a) Engages in discrimination that is prohibited by federal or state law.
(b) Violates regulations or guidance disseminated by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(c) Delays, denies, or modifies healthcare services.
(2) Artificial intelligence or an automated decision system used in the
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-545 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 246
determination process shall not base its determination or determination
recommendation solely on a group data set.
(3) Artificial intelligence or an automated decision system shall base its
determination or determination recommendation on any the following:
(a) The insured's medical or other clinical history.
(b) Individual clinical circumstances as presented by a requesting
provider.
(c) Other relevant clinical information contained in the insured's medical
or other clinical history.
D.(1)(a) An entity subject to this Section shall not replace the role of a
healthcare provider in the determination process with artificial intelligence or
an automated decision system.
(b) Any adverse determination shall be signed by a licensed physician
who personally reviewed the medical record and is responsible for the clinical
judgment.
(2) An entity subject to this Section shall do all of the following:
(a) Require independent judgment from human utilization review
personnel in the utilization review process before making an adverse
determination for either of the following:
(i) Any claim submitted by a provider based on medical necessity.
(ii) Any claim submitted by a provider for a procedure requiring prior
authorization.
(b) Comply with applicable regulations and guidance for artificial
intelligence or automated decision system use issued by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(c) Review the performance, use, and outcomes of an artificial
intelligence or an automated decision system at a minimum of once per quarter,
and revise the policies and procedures as needed to ensure compliance with this
Section.
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-545 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 246
(d) Use patient data within its intended and stated purpose consistent
with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
as applicable.
(3)(a) A health insurance issuer shall disclose to the enrollee and the
department when artificial intelligence or an automated decision system was
used in any part of a coverage determination or utilization review.
(b) The health insurance issuer shall document the extent to which any
artificial intelligence or automated decision system influenced the
determination.
E.(1) Any insured has the right to appeal a determination that he has
learned was made with a recommendation from an artificial intelligence or an
automated decision system.
(2) Any adverse determination in which artificial intelligence or an
automated decision system materially contributed to the determination shall be
presumed invalid unless the health insurance issuer demonstrates that the
determination was independently reached through documented clinical
judgment without reliance upon algorithmic output.
(3) If an adverse determination is appealed on the basis of the use of an
artificial intelligence or an automated decision system, the insurer shall not use
an artificial intelligence or an automated decision system in any subsequent
review of the claim.
F.(1) An entity subject to this Section shall allow the commissioner to
inspect and audit the artificial intelligence or automated decision system for
compliance with this Section and review policies and procedures for how the
artificial intelligence or automated decision system is used in the determination
process.
(2) The commissioner may require submission and independent review
of any artificial intelligence or automated decision system used in utilization
review.
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-545 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 246
(3) Upon request of the commissioner, a health insurance issuer shall
disclose the data sources, training parameters, and validation methods used to
develop any artificial intelligence or automated decision system used in coverage
determinations.
(4) The health insurance issuer shall pay for any independent review that
the commissioner deems necessary.
* * *
§2401. Requirements of federal laws and regulations; minimum requirements
Health insurance issuers shall implement effective processes for appeals of
coverage determinations and claims. The processes shall comply with any applicable
federal law or regulation. Under such processes, a health insurance issuer shall, at a
minimum:
* * *
(4) Allow covered persons, upon request, to review and have copies of all
documents relevant to any artificial intelligence or an automated decision
system as defined in R.S. 22:1260.49(A)(1) used in the utilization review or
determination process.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any new policy, contract,
program, or health coverage plan issued on or after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract,
or health coverage plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the
provisions of this Act on or before the renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2028.